InalienN.lexc
!Complete Template for Inalienable Nouns. There are 2 sizes, 2 numbers, and optional possession (2) = 8 forms total

LEXICON Inalienable
    IANstems ;
    Proper ;

LEXICON IANstems 
nuuru Number ;
paama Number ;
uʃti Number ;
nawak'u Number ;
lak'uwa Number ;
ay'a Number ;
naru Number ;

LEXICON Proper
Hwan # ;
Tuuru' # ;
Sipani # ;
